North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.3 Dry Bean Industry Promotion [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.3-01.
Legislative policy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-03.
North Dakota dry bean council — Membership — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-04.
Dry bean districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-05.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-06.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-07.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-08.
Tax levies — Collection — Reports — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-09.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-10.
Referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-11.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-12.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 62, § 4.

4-10.3-13.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.3-14.
Misdemeanor to violate chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 62, § 4.